src/eieverb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +1p +2p +3p +sg +pl +mInd +mSub +mCond +mImp +tFut +tPres +tImp +tPret +pastPart +Gerund ^GV1 ^GV2 ^GV3
LEXICON Root
acertar Verb1;
acrecentar Verb1;
alentar Verb1;
acertar Verb1;
apretar Verb1;
arrendar Verb1;
atravesar Verb1;
calentar Verb1;
cegar Verb1;
cerrar Verb1;
comenzar Verb1;
concertar Verb1;
confesar Verb1;
desconcertar Verb1;
desherbar Verb1;
desmembrar Verb1;
despertar Verb1;
desterrar Verb1;
empezar Verb1;
encomendar Verb1;
enmendar Verb1;
enterrar Verb1;
errar Verb1;
fregar Verb1;
gobernar Verb1;
helar Verb1;
invernar Verb1;
manifestar Verb1;
mentar Verb1;
merendar Verb1;
negar Verb1;
nevar Verb1;
pensar Verb1;
plegar Verb1;
quebrar Verb1;
recomendar Verb1;
regar Verb1;
renegar Verb1;
segar Verb1;
sembrar Verb1;
segar Verb1;
sembrar Verb1;
sentar Verb1;
serrar Verb1;
temblar Verb1;
tentar Verb1;
tropezar Verb1;
jugar Verb1;

acordar Verb1;
acostar Verb1;
almorzar Verb1;
apostar Verb1;
avergonzar Verb1;
colarar Verb1;
colgar Verb1;
concordar Verb1;
consolar Verb1;
contar Verb1;
costar Verb1;
degollar Verb1;
denostar Verb1;
derrocar Verb1;
encontrar Verb1;
forzar Verb1;
holgar Verb1;
mostrar Verb1;
poblar Verb1;
probar Verb1;
recordar Verb1;
regoldar Verb1;
renovar Verb1;
rodar Verb1;
rogar Verb1;
soldar Verb1;
soltar Verb1;
sonar Verb1;
soñar Verb1;
tostar Verb1;
trocar Verb1;
tronar Verb1;
volar Verb1;
volcar Verb1;

absolver Verb2;
cocer Verb2;
demoler Verb2;
disolver Verb2;
doler Verb2;
llover Verb2;
moler Verb2;
morder Verb2;
mover Verb2;
oler Verb2;
poder Verb2;
resolver Verb2;
soler Verb2;
torcer Verb2;
volver Verb2;
adquirir Verb2;
inquirir Verb2;

ceñir Verb2;
colegir Verb2;
competir Verb2;
concebir Verb2;
conseguir Verb2;
corregir Verb2;
deretir Verb2;
despedir Verb2;
elegir Verb2;
embestir Verb2;
expedir Verb2;
gemir Verb2;
henchir Verb2;
impedir Verb2;
investir Verb2;
medir Verb2;
pedir Verb2;
perseguir Verb2;
proseguir Verb2;
regir Verb2;
reir Verb2;
rendir Verb2;
reñir Verb2;
repetir Verb2;
seguir Verb2;
servir Verb2;
sonreír Verb2;
teñir Verb2;
vestir Verb2;
freír Verb2;

!Verbs ending in ar
LEXICON Verb1
+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:^^^o #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:^^^as #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:^^^a #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:^^^an #;


+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:^^^e #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:^^^es #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:^^^e #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:^^^en #;


!Verbs ending in er
LEXICON Verb2
+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:^^^o #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:^^^es #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:^^^e #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:^^^en #;


+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:^^^a #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:^^^as #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:^^^a #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mSub:^^^^amos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mSub:^^^^áis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:^^^an #;

+V+3p+sg+tPret: ^^^^ió #;
+V+3p+pl+tPret: ^^^^ieron #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^^^^iera #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^^^^ieras #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^^^^iera #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^^^^iéramos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^^^^ierais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^^^ieran #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^^^^iese #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^^^^ieses #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^^^^iese #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^^^^iésemos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^^^^ieseis #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^^^^iesen #;
+V+Gerund:^^^^iendo #;
